Washington statutes.
RCW 19.64.020

Speaker or sponsor liability not limited.

Nothing contained shall be construed as limiting the liability of any speaker or his or her sponsor or sponsors for defamatory statements made by such speaker in or as a part of any such broadcast.

[ 2011 c 336 s 544; 1943 c 229 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 998-2.]